North Carolina, session 2025, HB43.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 145 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 145-52. State balloon rally.
The Carolina BalloonFest, held in October of every year in the City of Statesville, is adopted
as the official balloon rally of the State of North Carolina."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H43-v-1*